Utah statutes.
31A-36-110.   Payment and document requirements.

(1) (a)  A life settlement provider shall instruct the owner to send the executed documents required to effect the change in ownership or assignment or change of beneficiary of the affected policy to a designated independent escrow agent.

(b)  Within three business days after the day on which the escrow agent receives the documents, or within three business days after the day on which the life settlement provider receives the documents if by mistake they are sent directly to the life settlement provider, the life settlement provider shall deposit the proceeds of the life settlement into an escrow or trust account of the escrow agent in a federally insured depository institution.

(2) (a)  Upon completion of the requirements of Subsection (1), the escrow agent shall deliver the original documents executed by the owner to:

(i)  the life settlement provider; or

(ii)  a related provider trust or other designated representative of the life settlement provider.

(b)  Upon the life settlement provider's receipt from the insurer of an acknowledgment of the change in ownership or assignment or change of beneficiary of the affected policy, the life settlement provider shall instruct the escrow agent to pay the proceeds of the life settlement to the owner.

(3)  Payment to the owner must be made within three business days after the day on which the life settlement provider receives the acknowledgment from the insurer.  Failure to make the payment within that time makes the life settlement voidable by the owner for lack of consideration until payment is tendered to and accepted by the owner.

